it: Simbolo medico: Caduceo; Cuore con cardiogramma; Nessun simbolo; Croce rossa; Bastone di Asclepio; Stella della vita; Altro
sk-SK: Medicínsky symbol: Kaduceus; Srdce s kardiogramom; Žiadny symbol; Červený kríž; Asklépiosova palica; Hviezda života; Iné
fr: Symbole médical: Caducée; Cœur avec cardiogramme; Aucun symbole; Croix rouge; Bâton d'Asclépios; Étoile de vie; Autre
el: Ιατρικό σύμβολο: Κηρύκειο; Καρδιά με καρδιογράφημα; Χωρίς σύμβολο; Ερυθρός Σταυρός; Ράβδος του Ασκληπιού; Αστέρι της ζωής; Άλλο
vi: Biểu tượng y tế: Caduceus; Tim với điện tâm đồ; Không có biểu tượng; Chữ thập đỏ; Gậy của Asclepius; Ngôi sao sự sống; Khác
cs: Lékařský symbol: Kaduceus; Srdce s kardiogramem; Bez symbolu; Červený kříž; Asklépiova hůl; Hvězda života; Jiné
lt-LT: Medicininis simbolis: Kaducėjus; Širdis su kardiograma; Be simbolio; Raudonasis kryžius; Asklepijo lazda; Gyvybės žvaigždė; Kita
nl: Medisch symbool: Caduceus; Hart met cardiogram; Geen symbool; Rode kruis; Staf van Asclepius; Ster van het leven; Andere
zh-TW: 醫療符號: 商神杖; 心臟心電圖; 無符號; 紅十字; 阿斯克勒庇俄斯之杖; 生命之星; 其他
ko: 의료 기호: 카두케우스; 심전도가 있는 하트; 기호 없음; 적십자; 아스클레피오스의 지팡이; 생명의 별; 기타
hu: Orvosi szimbólum: Caduceus; Szív kardiogrammal; Nincs szimbólum; Vörös kereszt; Aszklépiosz bot; Életcsillag; Egyéb
en: Medical symbol: Caduceus; Heart with Cardiogram; No symbol; Red Cross; Rod of Asclepius; Star of Life; Other
ru: Медицинский символ: Кадуцей; Сердце с кардиограммой; Без символа; Красный крест; Жезл Асклепия; Звезда жизни; Другой
pt-PT: Símbolo médico: Caduceu; Coração com cardiograma; Sem símbolo; Cruz vermelha; Vara de Asclépio; Estrela da vida; Outro
nb: Medisinsk symbol: Kaduceus; Hjerte med kardiogram; Ingen symbol; Røde kors; Asklepios-staven; Livets stjerne; Annet
fi: Lääketieteellinen symboli: Caduceus; Sydän kardiogrammilla; Ei symbolia; Punainen risti; Asklepioksen sauva; Elämän tähti; Muu
de: Medizinisches Symbol: Hermesstab; Herz mit Kardiogramm; Kein Symbol; Rotes Kreuz; Äskulapstab; Stern des Lebens; Sonstiges
da: Medicinsk symbol: Caduceus; Hjerte med kardiogram; Intet symbol; Rødt kors; Æskulapstaven; Livets stjerne; Andet
es: Símbolo médico: Caduceo; Corazón con cardiograma; Sin símbolo; Cruz roja; Vara de Esculapio; Estrella de la vida; Otros
tr: Tıbbi sembol: Kaduceus; Kardiyogramlı kalp; Sembol yok; Kızıl haç; Asklepios'un asası; Yaşam yıldızı; Diğer
sv: Medicinsk symbol: Kaducé; Hjärta med kardiogram; Ingen symbol; Röda korset; Asklepiosstaven; Livets stjärna; Övrigt
ja: 医療シンボル: カドゥケウス; 心電図付きハート; シンボルなし; 赤十字; アスクレピオスの杖; スターオブライフ; その他
th: สัญลักษณ์ทางการแพทย์: คาดูเซียส; หัวใจพร้อมคลื่นหัวใจ; ไม่มีสัญลักษณ์; กากบาทแดง; คทาของแอสคลีเปียส; ดาวแห่งชีวิต; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Medicinski simbol: Kaducej; Srce s kardiogramom; Bez simbola; Crveni križ; Asklepijev štap; Zvijezda života; Ostalo
pl: Symbol medyczny: Kaduceusz; Serce z kardiogramem; Brak symbolu; Czerwony krzyż; Laska eskulapa; Gwiazda życia; Inne
pt-BR: Símbolo médico: Caduceu; Coração com cardiograma; Sem símbolo; Cruz vermelha; Bastão de Asclépio; Estrela da vida; Outro
zh-CN: 医疗符号: 双蛇杖; 心脏与心电图; 无符号; 红十字; 阿斯克勒庇俄斯之杖; 生命之星; 其他
ro-RO: Simbol medical: Caduceu; Inimă cu cardiogramă; Fără simbol; Cruce roșie; Toiagul lui Asclepios; Steaua vieții; Altele
sl-SI: Medicinski simbol: Kaducej; Srce s kardiogramom; Brez simbola; Rdeči križ; Asklepijeva palica; Zvezda življenja; Drugo
bg-BG: Медицински символ: Кадуцей; Сърце с кардиограма; Без символ; Червен кръст; Жезъл на Асклепий; Звезда на живота; Други